Florida, session 2026, HB653.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (1) and (3) of section 203.012,
Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
203.012 Definitions.—As used in this chapter:
(1) "Distribution company" means any person owning or
operating local electric or natural or manufactured gas utility
distribution facilities within this state for the transmission,
delivery, and sale of electricity or natural or manufactured
gas. The term does not include natural gas transmission
companies that are subject to the jurisdiction of the Federal
Energy Regulatory Commission. The term does not include a person
owning or operating electric vehicle charging stations as
defined in s. 366.94(2)(a).
(3) "Utility service" means electricity for light, heat,
or power; and natural or manufactured gas for light, heat, or
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb653-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 653 2026
power, including transportation, delivery, transmission, and
distribution of the electricity or natural or manufactured gas.
This subsection does not broaden the definition of utility
service to include separately stated charges for tangible
personal property or services which are not charges for the
electricity or natural or manufactured gas or the
transportation, delivery, transmission, or distribution of
electricity or natural or manufactured gas. The term does not
include the sale of electricity to the public by an operator of
an electric vehicle charging station operating under s. 366.94.
Section 2. Paragraph (a) of subsection (14) of section
212.02, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
212.02 Definitions.—The following terms and phrases when
used in this chapter have the meanings ascribed to them in this
section, except where the context clearly indicates a different
meaning:
(14)(a) "Retail sale" or a "sale at retail" means a sale
to a consumer or to any person for any purpose other than for
resale in the form of tangible personal property or services
taxable under this chapter, and includes all such transactions
that may be made in lieu of retail sales or sales at retail. A
sale for resale includes a sale of qualifying property. As used
in this paragraph, the term "qualifying property" means tangible
personal property, other than electricity, which is used or
consumed by a government contractor in the performance of a
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb653-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 653 2026
qualifying contract as defined in s. 212.08(17)(c), to the
extent that the cost of the property is allocated or charged as
a direct item of cost to such contract, title to which property
vests in or passes to the government under the contract. The
term "government contractor" includes prime contractors and
subcontractors. As used in this paragraph, a cost is a "direct
item of cost" if it is a "direct cost" as defined in 48 C.F.R.
s. 9904.418-30(a)(2), or similar successor provisions, including
costs identified specifically with a particular contract. A sale
for resale also includes a sale of electricity to the operator
of an electric vehicle charging station used in providing
electric vehicle charging to the public pursuant to s. 366.94.
Section 3. The amendments made by this act to ss. 203.012
and 212.02, Florida Statutes, apply retroactively to January 1,
2019.
Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb653-00